Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 7
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Benefits

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 1, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 549, § 16: Mar. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the unprecedented increase in the cost of living has resulted in a particular hardship to persons living on a fixed retirement income in the State of Arkansas; that it is essential to the health and well being of the retired and active schoolteachers of this State that the benefits received by them be increased immediately to offset this unusual cost of living increase and that this act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 655, § 5: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that benefits to persons retired from the four Statewide retirement systems are inadequate, and that equitable increases need to be instituted immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 681, § 14: Apr. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 776, § 3: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living and that an increase in these annuities is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 14, § 2: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living, and an increase in retirement annuities for teachers is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 365, § 9: Mar. 9, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 435, § 3: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living, that the benefit formula of the Teacher Retirement System is lower than the formulas of other state retirement systems, and that an increase in retirement annuities for teachers is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 885, § 2: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some members of the Teacher Retirement System who have retired since July 1, 1978, are receiving less in benefits than they would be receiving if they had retired on or before July 1, 1978, and received the $.75 per month per year of credited service provided by Act 655 of 1979, that such a penalty for additional years of teaching service is inconsistent with sound public policy and should be corrected at the earliest opportunity. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and in effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 127, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living, that the benefit formula of the Teacher Retirement System is lower than the formulas of other state retirement systems, and that an increase in retirement annuities for teachers is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 162, § 3: Feb. 19, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly the purchasing power of retired teachers continues to be eroded by inflation and that this increase in benefits is badly needed to maintain a reasonable standard of living. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 805, § 12: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 4, § 6: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1987, No. 802, § 4: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living, that the benefit formula of the Teacher Retirement System is lower than the formulas of other state retirement systems, and that an increase in retirement annuities for teachers is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 39, § 3: July 1, 1989.

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 14: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 43, § 11: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 44, § 8: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that annuities now being paid to retired teachers are insufficient to afford an adequate standard of living, that the benefit formula of the Teacher Retirement System is lower than the formulas of other state retirement systems, and that an increase in retirement annuities for teachers is needed at the earliest possible time. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 51, § 5: Feb. 7, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the law providing for a means for retirants to choose an option causes an undue hardship on some beneficiaries; that it is necessary to provide an option to allow qualified beneficiaries to change that option; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 239, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in instances where a retirant under the Teacher Retirement System is an employee of a public employer whose employees are covered by the Teacher Retirement System then for each twelve (12) month period ending June 30, the amount of his annuity should be subject to the limitations equivalent to twice the limitations imposed by the social security retirement test; that this act so provides; and that in order for this act to go into effect for the twelve (12) month period ending June 30, 1992, this emergency clause must be adopted. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 435, § 12: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that changed conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 478, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that inequities exist in the recision procedure and that active members of the Teacher Retirement System should be allowed to purchase previous service rendered while a retirant. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 972, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that changes in the federal Internal Revenue Code and federal IRS regulations have made several provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law in need of revision and updating, that the law needs to be updated in order to prevent an unfair tax impact on the system's members and dependents, and that certain changes in the Teacher Retirement System law are necessary to efficiently and effectively administer the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect retroactive to July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 281, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the certain restrictions placed on the retirement of members under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are inequitable and that those restrictions should be changed and eliminated as soon as practicable without delay in order to avoid an undue hardship to many retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, in order to reduce the inequities of the Teacher Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 282, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the methods of computing retirement benefits for members of the Teacher Retirement System and the certain restrictions placed on the retirement of inactive members under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are inequitable and that those methods of computing benefits and those restrictions should be changed and eliminated as soon as practicable without delay in order to avoid an undue hardship to many retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, in order to reduce inequities of the Teacher Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 528, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary to provide members of the Teacher Retirement System with the opportunity to change their retirement options upon retirement; that this change in Arkansas law will provide the system retirants a needed alternative to the rigid annuities of the past; and that it will correct some inequitable situations which occur subsequent to retirement for some individual retirants. Therefore, in order to aid retirants in their retirement planning, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 542, § 10: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changing conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1293, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retirement benefits of members of the Teacher Retirement System are subject to an earnings limitation on the amount of earnings a retirant can receive in salary from another public school employer; that the earnings limitation deprives state colleges and universities of a valuable educational resource of experienced instructors; and that the earnings limitation creates an inequity for members of the Teacher Retirement System who wish to teach in higher education. Therefore, in order to correct this inequity and allow for its effective implementation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 384, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain occupational groups are exempt from the annuity limitation under the Teacher Retirement System; that this exemption creates an inequitable situation with other groups; and eliminating this exemption is essential to the equitable administration of the retirement system. Therefore, in order to restore equity among the groups under the system, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 442, § 6: Mar. 11, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is herby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retirement benefits payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System retiring prior to July 1, 1991 were not increased at the same rate as benefits have increased since then; that the retirant and beneficiary payments for retirants who retired prior to July 1, 1991 are inadequate; and that the the retirant and beneficiary payments for retirants retiring prior to July 1, 1991 should be increased as soon as possible in order to relieve this inequity in the System. Therefore, in order to reduce an inequity in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved or vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 992, § 17: Apr. 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that, during the 1990's, behavioral problems with students and the number of school security problems have increased dramatically in the public schools of Arkansas; that older public school employees are more susceptible to these problems and are more adversely affected by this increased job stress; that younger employees can more easily adjust to these changes in the public school work environment; and that reducing the amount of time a public school employee must serve to receive full retirement benefits under the Teacher Retirement System to twenty-eight (28) years of service credit and increasing the amount of the retirement benefit multiplier for the System's active members will improve the motivation of public school employees and increase the productivity of the public schools and educational institutions in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to more effectively utilize public school and educational funds, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved or vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1022, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this section herein is added to the Arkansas Code to provide a benefit for beneficiaries of members and retirants of the Arkansas Teacher retirement system for their service dedicated to the facilitation of educating Arkansas' children. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and in effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 1074, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there are members of the Teacher Retirement System who retired before July 1, 1984 on reduced retirements when service requirements were thirty-five (35) years; that, since then, the service requirement was reduced to thirty (30) years; and that those persons retiring in 1984 on reduced annuities should be adjusted to relieve an inequity and implementation of the provisions of this act is necessary to begin at the start of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote relief of inequities and sound fiscal administration, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 30, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain Teacher Retirement System retirants are sometimes needed by the Arkansas Department of Education to fulfill vital positions within the educational system of Arkansas, that current retirement law limits the amount of salaries which can be paid to System retirees and the law needs to provide a method by which the System can waive those earning limitations, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 221, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that members of the Teacher Retirement System who receive the minimum benefits are some of the poorest retirees and are in the most need of having their benefits increased, and that the minimum benefits need adjusting based on the number of years of service to increase the equity of the benefit structure of the retirement system, and therefore this act should have effect immediately with the beginning of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 312, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that deceased members of the Teacher Retirement System leave families in need of financial support and that there is a necessity of financial stability for families during this time of crisis and the death benefit provisions should be increased, and that increasing the death benefit provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should have effect immediately with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 395, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain retirement annuity options continue for long periods of time, that providing these retirants with the capability of changing those options in the event of a death or divorce of the retirant or his beneficiaries will provide the needed flexibility in their financial conditions and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 400, § 6: Mar. 4, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that changes in the amount of monthly benefits in the Teacher Retirement System are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year and therefore this act should have immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 866, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system, that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that benefit provisions applicable to local officers and employees need revision, and that the effective administration of this act makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1521, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that early retirement penalties for the Teacher Retirement System are overly harsh, that incentives for teachers to retire will improve staff morale and the working environment, and that the beginning of the fiscal year is the most advantageous time to implement benefit changes with the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1590, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System has reduced the amount of service credit needed for full retirement to twenty-eight (28) years of credited service, that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is an important incentive to keep experienced teachers in the classroom rather than retiring completely, that experienced teachers are a valuable human resource and should be encouraged to stay in the classroom, and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the best time to implement any change in retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 5: Retroactive to Jan. 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 7: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law need to be reconciled with federal tax laws; that these changes should take place retroactively to January 1, 2001; and that this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 359, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that deceased members of the Teacher Retirement System leave families in need of financial support, that there is a necessity of financial stability for families during this time of crisis, that the death benefit provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year, and therefore this act should take effect with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 360, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an additional monthly benefit amount for Teacher Retirement retirees will help offset the increasing cost of health insurance; and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the most administratively advantageous time to implement a benefit increase for the system. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 461, § 7: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is a necessity to set a normal retirement age for eligibility for retirement benefits in order to maintain the integrity of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that changes in legal provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year; and therefore this act should take effect with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 481, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirants are sometimes needed by the Arkansas Department of Education and the public schools to fulfill vital positions within the educational system of Arkansas; that by allowing them to participate in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, their motivation to return to active teaching service will be enhanced; that the law needs to provide a method by which the system can permit them to return and earn T-DROP benefits; and that the most effective time to make these changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 742, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that nonteaching employees of Arkansas school districts have more in common with fellow educational employees than with public employees; that allowing the nonteaching employees to earn service credit in the Teacher Retirement System will promote more effective use of educational funds in Arkansas; and that in order to promote the proper operation of the school districts these laws need to be effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective beginning July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1146, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirants of the Teacher Retirement System are sometimes needed by the public schools of Arkansas to fill vital positions within the educational system of Arkansas; that the current retirement law limits the amount of salary which can be paid to a retiree and the law needs to provide that a teacher may return to active employment after retirement; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1300, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the length of time for earning an unreduced retirement benefit for the Teacher Retirement System was lowered to twenty-eight (28) years and the penalty percentage for early retirement was reduced significantly in 1997; that many members of the retirement system retired on early retirement annuities before that time under a higher percentage penalty; that this difference creates an inequity between those retiring before and after 1997; and that it is necessary to correct this inequity which is best done at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”
